District of Columbia statutes.
2-1223.06

Repealed

Board of Directors — Officers; bylaws and procedures.

Repealed.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 106, 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 121(b), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 104(a), 55 DCR 1689
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 106 of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).